Nebraska, session 109, LB902.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Medical Standards for Incarcerated Individuals Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds and declares:
(a) Incarcerated individuals are entirely dependent on the state for
access to medical care, and the state has a constitutional and moral duty
to provide such care;
(b) Sections 83-4,154 and 83-4,155 require the Department of
Correctional Services to provide inmates with medical services to the
community standard of health care. This standard is vague and does not
offer clear guidance. It has not been interpreted uniformly or
consistently enforced. As a result, there is a significant variability in
the community standard of health care provided at the department's
various facilities;
(c) Inconsistent medical protocols, delayed diagnostic testing,
inadequate follow-up procedures, and unclear reporting requirements
contribute to preventable medical harm in Nebraska correctional
facilities; and
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish uniform minimum
procedures that support, clarify, and operationalize the department's
duty to provide inmates with the community standard of health care.
(2) The purposes of the Medical Standards for Incarcerated
Individuals Act are to:
(a) Clarify and strengthen medical care standards in Nebraska
correctional facilities;
(b) Ensure timely and adequate treatment of chronic and acute health
conditions;
(c) Create mandatory reporting requirements for suspected medical
neglect; and
(d) Provide independent investigation of inmate deaths potentially
related to medical care failures.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Medical Standards for Incarcerated
-2-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
Individuals Act:
(1) Chronic or acute medical condition means any condition requiring
ongoing management, periodic monitoring, specialized testing, or prompt
diagnostic evaluation;
(2) Community standard of health care has the same meaning as in
section 83-4,154;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Health care services has the same meaning as in section
83-4,154;
(5) Health complaint means any verbal or written request for health
care services made by an inmate;
(6) Inmate has the same meaning as in section 83-4,154;
(7) Facility has the same meaning as in section 83-170;
(8) Medical director means the medical director for the department
appointed under section 83-4,156; and
(9) Medical neglect means the failure to provide timely evaluation,
treatment, monitoring, or follow-up care in a manner that aligns with
professional standards of medical practice.
Sec. 4. (1) The medical director shall develop and implement
standardized medical care protocols for inmates' chronic and acute
medical conditions. Such protocols shall be used by the department when
administering health care services to inmates.
(2) Such protocols shall include:
(a) Ongoing monitoring of diagnosed health conditions;
(b) Timely access to medications, diagnostic testing, and specialist
care;
(c) Documentation and tracking of all assessments and treatment
plans; and
(d) Routine screening and early detection procedures for individuals
reporting persistent symptoms or presenting risk factors for chronic or
acute medical conditions. Screening must occur within a timeframe not to
-3-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
exceed forty-eight hours after symptoms are reported, except that
screening shall occur as soon as possible when immediate care is
required.
(3) The medical director shall annually review the protocols
developed under this section and update them to reflect current medical
guidelines.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall document any health complaint of
an inmate upon receipt of such health complaint.
(2) Each facility shall establish a maximum timeframe, not to exceed
forty-eight hours, for medical staff to conduct an initial assessment in
response to an inmate's health complaint. In the case of urgent or
immediate symptoms, such initial assessment shall be conducted as soon as
possible.
(3) The department shall maintain a record of all actions taken in
response to each health complaint. Such records shall immediately be made
available to the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional
System upon request.
Sec. 6. (1) Any department employee or contractor who witnesses or
suspects medical neglect shall make a report to the office of Inspector
General of the Nebraska Correctional System. Reports shall be submitted
in a form and manner prescribed by the office.
(2) Any person making a report of medical neglect that such person
reasonably believes is required by this section or participating in any
investigation or proceeding arising from such report shall be immune from
any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or
imposed, except for maliciously false statements.
Sec. 7. The department and medical director shall implement all
required protocols, reporting systems, and oversight coordination
necessary to carry out the Medical Standards for Incarcerated Individuals
Act on or before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 8. Section 50-1901, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-4-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
amended to read:
50-1901 Sections 50-1901 to 50-1921 and section 13 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 9. Section 50-1904, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-1904 For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of (a)
a program or an office of the department or (b) a private agency;
(2) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(3) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(4) Inspector General means the Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System appointed under section 50-1905;
(5) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal
right to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or
interferes with performance of an official duty;
(6) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;
(7) Medical neglect has the same meaning as in section 3 of this
act;
(8) (7) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that
a person may lawfully do;
(9) (8) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an
investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an
investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or
slow;
(10) (9) Office means the office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System and includes the Inspector General and other
employees of the office;
(11) (10) Private agency means an entity that contracts with the
department or contracts to provide services to another entity that
-5-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
contracts with the department; and
(12) (11) Record means any recording in written, audio, electronic,
or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft,
memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, message, medical
record, mental health record, case file, clinical record, financial
record, and administrative record.
Sec. 10. Section 50-1906, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-1906 (1) The office shall investigate:
(a) Allegations or incidents of possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violations of statutes or of rules or regulations of the
department by an employee of or a person under contract with the
department or a private agency;
(b) Death or serious injury of individuals in the custody or under
the supervision of the department. The department shall report all such
cases of death or serious injury to the Inspector General as soon as
reasonably possible after the department learns of such death or serious
injury. The department shall also report all cases of the death or
serious injury of an employee when acting in such employee's capacity as
an employee of the department as soon as reasonably possible after the
department learns of such death or serious injury. The department shall
also report all cases when an employee is hospitalized in response to an
injury received when such employee is acting in such employee's capacity
as an employee of the department as soon as reasonably possible after the
department learns of such hospitalization. For purposes of this
subdivision, serious injury means an injury which requires urgent and
immediate medical treatment and restricts the injured person's usual
activity; and
(c) Allegations or incidents of medical neglect of individuals in
the custody or under the supervision of the department; and
(d) (c) Any other matter as provided in the annual work plans or key
-6-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
performance indicators approved by the Legislative Oversight Committee
pursuant to section 50-1702.
(2) Any investigation conducted by the Inspector General shall be
independent of and separate from an investigation pursuant to sections
23-1821 to 23-1823.
(3) The department shall notify the Inspector General as soon as
practicable when a criminal investigation involving a death or serious
injury required to be reported to the Inspector General under subdivision
(1)(b) of this section has commenced and when such criminal investigation
has concluded.
(4) Notwithstanding the fact that a criminal investigation, a
criminal prosecution, or both are in progress, all law enforcement
agencies and prosecuting attorneys may cooperate with any investigation
conducted by the Inspector General and may, upon request by the Inspector
General, provide the Inspector General with copies of all law enforcement
reports which are relevant to the Inspector General's investigation. All
law enforcement reports which have been provided to the Inspector General
pursuant to this section are not public records for purposes of sections
84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall not be subject to discovery by any other
person or entity. Except to the extent that disclosure of information is
otherwise provided for in the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act, the Inspector General shall maintain the
confidentiality of all law enforcement reports received pursuant to its
request under this section. Law enforcement agencies and prosecuting
attorneys may, when requested by the Inspector General, collaborate with
the Inspector General regarding all other information relevant to the
Inspector General's investigation. The Inspector General shall, when
requested to do so by a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney,
suspend an investigation by the office until a criminal investigation or
prosecution is completed or has proceeded to a point that, in the
judgment of the Inspector General, reinstatement of the Inspector
-7-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
General's investigation will not impede or infringe upon the criminal
investigation or prosecution.
(5) Consistent with the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct,
counsel for the entity under investigation shall not represent a witness.
A witness may request that counsel for the entity under investigation be
present while being questioned, but such entity shall not require a
witness to make such a request. If such a request is made, the entity
under investigation shall inform the witness that such entity's counsel
does not represent the witness. For purposes of this subsection, entity
under investigation means the entity that is the subject of an
investigation under the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act and includes the department and a private agency.
(6) The office may conduct audits, inspections, investigations, and
other oversight as necessary to perform the duties of the office and to
carry out the purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act.
Sec. 11. Section 50-1907, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-1907 (1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. Reports
of medical neglect under section 6 of this act may be made to the office
in the form and manner prescribed by the office.
(2) A complaint or report of medical neglect shall be evaluated to
determine if it alleges possible misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance,
medical neglect, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations of
the department by an employee of or a person under contract with the
department or a private agency. All complaints and reports shall be
evaluated to determine whether a full investigation is warranted.
(3) (2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a
complaint or report unless:
(a) The complaint or report alleges misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, medical neglect, or violation of a statute or of rules and
-8-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
regulations of the department;
(b) The complaint or report is against a person within the
jurisdiction of the office; and
(c) The allegations can be independently verified through
investigation.
(3) After receipt of a complaint or report, the Inspector General
shall determine whether the office will conduct a full investigation.
(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that
contracts with the department, the Inspector General shall give notice of
such investigation to the department.
Sec. 12. Section 50-1912, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-1912 (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
reports Reports of investigations conducted by the office shall not be
distributed beyond the entity that is the subject of the report without
the consent of the Inspector General.
(2) The office shall redact confidential information before
distributing a report of an investigation.
(3) The office may disclose confidential information to the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee at the chairperson's
request. The office may also disclose confidential information to the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee, the chairperson of
the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and the chairperson of
the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature when such disclosure is, in
the judgment of the Director of Legislative Oversight, appropriate to
keep the Legislature informed of important events, issues, and
developments in the Nebraska correctional system.
(4) The office may also disclose such confidential information to
the Legislative Oversight Committee when such disclosure is, in the
judgment of the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee,
appropriate to keep the Legislature informed of important events, issues,
-9-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
and developments in the Nebraska correctional system.
(5)(a) This subsection does not apply to reports of investigations
required under subsection (6) of this section.
(b) A summarized final report based on an investigation may be
publicly released in order to bring awareness to systemic issues.
(c) (b) Such report shall be released only:
(i) After a disclosure is made to the chairperson of the Legislative
Oversight Committee pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and
(ii) If a determination is made by the Inspector General with the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee that doing so would be
in the best interest of the public.
(d) (c) If there is disagreement about whether releasing the report
would be in the best interest of the public, the chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall make the final decision.
(6) When the office completes an investigation of a death of an
individual in the custody or under the supervision of the department in
which medical neglect is suspected, alleged, or reasonably indicated, the
office shall release a public report of the investigation. Such report
shall be released within fifteen days after the office has complied with
sections 50-1914 and 50-1915.
(7) (d) The Legislative Oversight Committee shall be notified prior
to a report of an investigation being publicly released under this
section.
(8) (6) Records and documents, regardless of physical form, that are
obtained or produced by the office in the course of an investigation are
not public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. Reports
of investigations conducted by the office are not public records for
purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(9) (7) The office may withhold the identity of sources of
information to protect from retaliation any person who files a complaint
or provides information in good faith pursuant to the Office of Inspector
-10-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 13. (1) On or before May 15, 2028, and on or before each May
15 thereafter, the office shall:
(a) Conduct an audit of the department's compliance with the Medical
Standards for Incarcerated Individuals Act and the protocols developed
under section 4 of this act; and
(b) Present a report of the audit to the Director of Legislative
Oversight and the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee. The
Inspector General shall present the report of an investigation to the
Director of Correctional Services within three business days after the
report is presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight and the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee.
(2) Any person receiving a report under this section shall not
further distribute the report or any confidential information contained
in the report. The report shall not be distributed beyond the parties
except through the appropriate court procedures to the judge.
(3) A report that identifies misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance,
violation of statute, or violation of rules and regulations by an
employee of the department or a private agency that is relevant to
providing appropriate supervision of an employee may be shared with the
employer of such employee. The employer shall not further distribute the
report or any confidential information contained in the report.
(4) Within thirty business days after a report is presented to the
director:
(a) The director may determine whether to accept, reject, or request
modification of the recommendations contained in the report. Any response
shall be in writing and may include corrections of factual errors; and
(b) The director shall submit to the Inspector General a corrective
action plan to address any misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance,
violation of statute, or violation of rules and regulations identified in
the report.
-11-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
(5) The Inspector General, with input from the Director of
Legislative Oversight, may consider any request for modifications but is
not obligated to accept such request.
(6) Such report shall become final (a) upon the decision of the
director to accept or reject the recommendations in the report, (b)
within fifteen business days after the director requests modifications or
after the Inspector General incorporates such modifications, whichever
occurs earlier, or (c) thirty business days after the report is presented
to the director if no response is made. If the Inspector General does not
accept a requested modification, the recommendation for which such
modification was requested shall be considered to be rejected by the
director.
(7) Within fifteen business days after the report is presented to
the director, the report shall be presented to the private agency or
other provider of correctional services that is the subject of the report
and to persons involved in the implementation of the recommendations in
the report. Within fifteen business days after receipt of the report, the
private agency or other provider may submit a written response to the
office to correct any factual errors in the report. The Inspector
General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight, shall
consider all materials submitted under this subsection to determine
whether a corrected report shall be issued. If the Inspector General
determines that a corrected report is necessary, the corrected report
shall be issued within fifteen business days after receipt of the written
response.
(8) If the Inspector General does not issue a corrected report
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section or if the corrected report
does not address all issues raised in the written response, the private
agency or other provider may request that its written response, or
portions of the response, be appended to the report or corrected report.
(9) On or before October 1, 2028, and on or before each October 1
-12-

LB902 LB902
2026 2026
thereafter, the Inspector General shall release a public summary report
of the audit and report completed under this section. The public summary
report shall not contain any confidential or identifying information
concerning the subjects of the reports and investigations.
Sec. 14. Original sections 50-1901, 50-1904, 50-1906, 50-1907, and
50-1912, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-13-